Indiana, session 2026, SB255.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 3-8-1-23, AS AMENDED BY P.L.167-2015,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 23. This section does not apply to elections in
2027 and thereafter. A candidate for the office of county assessor
must satisfy the following:
(1) The candidate must have resided in the county for at least one
(1) year before the election, as provided in Article 6, Section 4 of
the Constitution of the State of Indiana.
(2) The candidate must own real property located in the county
upon taking office.
SECTION 2. IC 3-10-1-19, AS AMENDED BY P.L.227-2023,
SECTION 58, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 19. (a) The ballot for a primary election shall be
printed in substantially the form described in this section for all the
offices for which candidates have qualified under IC 3-8.
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


(b) The following shall be printed as the heading for the ballot for
a political party:
"OFFICIAL PRIMARY BALLOT
_________________ Party (insert the name of the political party)".
(c) The following shall be printed immediately below the heading
required by subsection (b) or be posted in each voting booth as
provided in IC 3-11-2-8(b):
(1) For paper ballots, print: To vote for a person, make a voting
mark (X or (cid:85)) on or in the box before the person's name in the
proper column.
(2) For optical scan ballots, print: To vote for a person, darken or
shade in the circle, oval, or square (or draw a line to connect the
arrow) that precedes the person's name in the proper column.
(3) For optical scan ballots that do not contain a candidate's name,
print: To vote for a person, darken or shade in the oval that
precedes the number assigned to the person's name in the proper
column.
(4) For electronic voting systems, print: To vote for a person,
touch the screen (or press the button) in the location indicated.
(d) Local public questions shall be placed on the primary election
ballot after the heading and the voting instructions described in
subsection (c) (if the instructions are printed on the ballot) and before
the offices described in subsection (g).
(e) The local public questions described in subsection (d) shall be
placed as follows:
(1) In a separate column on the ballot if voting is by paper ballot.
(2) After the heading and the voting instructions described in
subsection (c) (if the instructions are printed on the ballot) and
before the offices described in subsection (g), in the form
specified in IC 3-11-13-11 if voting is by ballot card.
(3) As provided by either of the following if voting is by an
electronic voting system:
(A) On a separate screen for a public question.
(B) After the heading and the voting instructions described in
subsection (c) (if the instructions are printed on the ballot) and
before the offices described in subsection (g), in the form
specified in IC 3-11-14-3.5.
(f) A public question shall be placed on the primary election ballot
in the following form:
(The explanatory text for the public question,
if required by law.)
"Shall (insert public question)?"
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


[] YES
[] NO
(g) The offices with candidates for nomination shall be placed on
the primary election ballot in the following order:
(1) Federal and state offices:
(A) President of the United States.
(B) United States Senator.
(C) Governor.
(D) United States Representative.
(2) Legislative offices:
(A) State senator.
(B) State representative.
(3) Circuit offices and county judicial offices:
(A) Judge of the circuit court, and unless otherwise specified
under IC 33, with each division separate if there is more than
one (1) judge of the circuit court.
(B) Judge of the superior court, and unless otherwise specified
under IC 33, with each division separate if there is more than
one (1) judge of the superior court.
(C) Judge of the probate court.
(D) Prosecuting attorney.
(E) Circuit court clerk.
(4) County offices:
(A) County auditor.
(B) County recorder.
(C) County treasurer.
(D) County sheriff.
(E) County coroner.
(F) County surveyor.
(G) County assessor.
(H) County commissioner.
(I) County council member.
(5) Township offices:
(A) Township assessor (only in a township referred to in
IC 36-6-5-1(d)). This clause does not apply to elections in
2027 and thereafter.
(B) Township trustee. This clause does not apply to elections
in 2027 and thereafter.
(C) Township board member.
(D) Judge of the small claims court.
(E) Constable of the small claims court.
(6) City offices:
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


(A) Mayor.
(B) Clerk or clerk-treasurer.
(C) Judge of the city court.
(D) City-county council member or common council member.
(7) Town offices:
(A) Clerk-treasurer.
(B) Judge of the town court.
(C) Town council member.
(h) The political party offices with candidates for election shall be
placed on the primary election ballot in the following order after the
offices described in subsection (g):
(1) Precinct committeeman.
(2) State convention delegate.
(i) The local offices to be elected at the primary election shall be
placed on the primary election ballot after the offices described in
subsection (h).
(j) The offices described in subsection (i) shall be placed as follows:
(1) In a separate column on the ballot if voting is by paper ballot.
(2) After the offices described in subsection (h) in the form
specified in IC 3-11-13-11 if voting is by ballot card.
(3) Either:
(A) on a separate screen for each office or public question; or
(B) after the offices described in subsection (h) in the form
specified in IC 3-11-14-3.5;
if voting is by an electronic voting system.
(k) If no candidate has filed to run for an office on the primary ballot
then the county election board may print "NO CANDIDATE FILED"
in the place on the ballot where a candidate's name would have been
printed.
SECTION 3. IC 3-10-2-13, AS AMENDED BY P.L.278-2019,
SECTION 41, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13. The following public officials shall be elected
at the general election before their terms of office expire and every four
(4) years thereafter:
(1) Clerk of the circuit court.
(2) County auditor.
(3) County recorder.
(4) County treasurer.
(5) County sheriff.
(6) County coroner.
(7) County surveyor.
(8) County assessor.
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


(9) County commissioner.
(10) County council member.
(11) Township trustee. This subdivision does not apply to
elections in 2027 and thereafter.
(12) Township board member.
(13) Township assessor (only in a township referred to in
IC 36-6-5-1(d)). This subdivision does not apply to elections in
2027 and thereafter.
(14) Judge of a small claims court.
(15) Constable of a small claims court.
SECTION 4. IC 3-11-2-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.40-2025,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. (a) The following offices shall be placed on
the general election ballot in the following order after the public
questions described in section 10(a) of this chapter:
(1) Federal and state offices:
(A) President and Vice President of the United States.
(B) United States Senator.
(C) Governor and lieutenant governor.
(D) Secretary of state.
(E) State comptroller (auditor of state).
(F) Treasurer of state.
(G) Attorney general.
(H) United States Representative. If an election to fill a
vacancy in an office of United States Representative under
IC 3-10-8 is held on the same day as the election for the next
term of the same office, the ballot shall list the election to fill
the vacancy in the office immediately after the election for the
next term of the office.
(2) Legislative offices:
(A) State senator.
(B) State representative.
(3) Circuit offices and county judicial offices:
(A) Judge of the circuit court, and unless otherwise specified
under IC 33, with each division separate if there is more than
one (1) judge of the circuit court.
(B) Judge of the superior court, and unless otherwise specified
under IC 33, with each division separate if there is more than
one (1) judge of the superior court.
(C) Judge of the probate court.
(D) Prosecuting attorney.
(E) Clerk of the circuit court.
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


(4) County offices:
(A) County auditor.
(B) County recorder.
(C) County treasurer.
(D) County sheriff.
(E) County coroner.
(F) County surveyor.
(G) County assessor.
(H) County commissioner.
(I) County council member.
(5) Township offices:
(A) Township assessor (only in a township referred to in
IC 36-6-5-1(d)). This clause does not apply to elections in
2027 and thereafter.
(B) Township trustee. This clause does not apply to elections
in 2027 and thereafter.
(C) Township board member.
(D) Judge of the small claims court.
(E) Constable of the small claims court.
(6) City offices:
(A) Mayor.
(B) Clerk or clerk-treasurer.
(C) Judge of the city court.
(D) City-county council member or common council member.
(7) Town offices:
(A) Clerk-treasurer.
(B) Judge of the town court.
(C) Town council member.
(b) If a major political party does not nominate a candidate for an
office on a general, municipal, or special election ballot then the county
election board may print "NO CANDIDATE FILED" in the place on
the ballot where the name of the major political party's nominee would
be printed.
SECTION 5. IC 3-13-10-3 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 3. (a) This section applies to a vacancy in the office of
township assessor not covered by section 1 of this chapter.
(b) A vacancy shall be filled by the county assessor, subject to the
approval of the department of local government finance. Except as
provided in subsection (c), the county assessor shall make the
appointment not later than thirty (30) days after the vacancy occurs. If
the vacancy occurred because the elected township assessor failed to
qualify or was removed, the person who is appointed must be of the
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


same political party as the elected township assessor.
(c) If a vacancy exists because of the death of the township assessor,
the county assessor shall make the appointment required by subsection
(b) not later than thirty (30) days after the county assessor receives
notice of the death under IC 5-8-6. The county assessor may not fill the
vacancy as required by subsection (b) until the county assessor receives
notice of the death under IC 5-8-6.
SECTION 6. IC 6-1.1-1-3.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 3.2. "Automated valuation model system" means a
centralized system of automated valuation models that may be
applied to property valuation.
SECTION 7. IC 6-1.1-1-24 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 24. If a transfer from a township assessor to the county
assessor of the assessment duties prescribed by this article occurs as
described in IC 36-2-15-5(c), a reference to the township assessor in
this article is considered to be a reference to the county assessor.
SECTION 8. IC 6-1.1-2-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) Except as
otherwise provided by law, Subject to subsections (b) and (c), all
tangible property which is within the jurisdiction of this state on the
assessment date of a year is subject to assessment and taxation for that
year.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and except for
agricultural land, tangible property that is within the jurisdiction
of this state shall not be subject to cyclical reassessment under
IC 6-1.1-4-4.2, annual adjustments under IC 6-1.1-4-4.5, or other
assessment after December 31, 2026, and before the assessment
date on which the department first begins conducting assessments
using the automated valuation model system under IC 6-1.1-2.5-1.
Instead, except for agricultural land, the assessed value of all
tangible property for an assessment date after December 31, 2026,
and before the department begins conducting assessments using the
automated valuation model system under IC 6-1.1-2.5-1, shall be
equal to the assessed value of the property for the 2026 assessment
date.
(c) Nothing in this section may be construed as limiting or
otherwise affecting:
(1) the collection of any property taxes or penalties imposed;
or
(2) any property tax exemptions or property tax deductions
allowed;
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


under this article or any other law before January 1, 2027.
SECTION 9. IC 6-1.1-2.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 2.5. Automated Valuation Model System
Sec. 1. Except for agricultural land, beginning with the first
assessment date that an automated valuation model system is
operational for use, the department shall conduct the cyclical
reassessment under IC 6-1.1-4-4.2, annual adjustments under
IC 6-1.1-4-4.5, and all other assessments required under this title,
for tangible property that is within the jurisdiction of this state by
determining the true tax value of tangible property using the
automated valuation model system developed under IC 6-1.1-30-21.
Sec. 2. The department shall begin conducting assessments
under this chapter using an automated valuation model system not
later than the earlier of:
(1) the first assessment date for which the automated
valuation model system is operational for use; or
(2) the 2037 assessment date.
SECTION 10. IC 6-1.1-3-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.249-2015,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) Subject to IC 6-1.1-2-1, and except as
provided in subsection (c), personal property which is owned by a
person who is a resident of this state shall be assessed at the place
where the owner resides on the assessment date of the year for which
the assessment is made.
(b) Subject to IC 6-1.1-2-1, and except as provided in subsection
(c), personal property which is owned by a person who is not a resident
of this state shall be assessed at the place where the owner's principal
office within this state is located on the assessment date of the year for
which the assessment is made.
(c) Subject to IC 6-1.1-2-1, personal property shall be assessed at
the place where it is situated on the assessment date of the year for
which the assessment is made if the property is:
(1) regularly used or permanently located where it is situated; or
(2) owned by a nonresident who does not have a principal office
within this state.
(d) If a personal property return is filed pursuant to subsection (c),
the owner of the property shall provide, within forty-five (45) days after
the filing deadline, a copy or other written evidence of the filing of the
return to the assessor of the county in which the owner resides. If such
evidence is not filed within forty-five (45) days after the filing
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


deadline, the county assessor for the area where the owner resides shall
determine if the owner filed a personal property return in the township
or county where the property is situated. If such a return was filed, the
property shall be assessed where it is situated. If such a return was not
filed, the county assessor for the area where the owner resides shall
notify the assessor of the township or county where the property is
situated, and the property shall be assessed where it is situated. This
subsection does not apply to a taxpayer who is required by the
department of local government finance to file a summary of the
taxpayer's business tangible personal property returns.
SECTION 11. IC 6-1.1-4-4.2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.236-2023,
SECTION 14, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4.2. (a) Beginning after December 31, 2026, and
ending with the assessment date on which the department first
begins conducting assessments using the automated valuation
model system under IC 6-1.1-2.5-1, a reassessment plan shall only
be submitted for and applied to the reassessment of agricultural
land. All other tangible real property, other than agricultural land,
shall not be subject to reassessment under this section, beginning
after December 31, 2026, and ending with the assessment date on
which the department first begins conducting assessments using the
automated valuation model system under IC 6-1.1-2.5-1.
(b) The county assessor of each county shall, before July 1, 2013,
and before May 1 of every fourth year thereafter, prepare and submit
to the department of local government finance a reassessment plan for
the county. The following apply to a reassessment plan prepared and
submitted under this section:
(1) The reassessment plan is subject to approval by the
department of local government finance. The department of local
government finance shall complete its review and approval of the
reassessment plan before:
(A) March 1, 2015; and
(B) January 1 of each subsequent year that follows a year in
which the reassessment plan is submitted by the county.
(2) The department of local government finance shall determine
the classes of real property to be used for purposes of this section.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (b), (c), the reassessment
plan must divide all parcels of real property in the county into
four (4) different groups of parcels. Each group of parcels must
contain approximately twenty-five percent (25%) of the parcels
within each class of real property in the county.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (b), (c), all real property in
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


each group of parcels shall be reassessed under the county's
reassessment plan once during each four (4) year cycle.
(5) The reassessment of a group of parcels in a particular class of
real property shall begin on May 1 of a year.
(6) The reassessment of parcels:
(A) must include a physical inspection of each parcel of real
property in the group of parcels that is being reassessed; and
(B) shall be completed on or before January 1 of the year after
the year in which the reassessment of the group of parcels
begins.
(7) For real property included in a group of parcels that is
reassessed, the reassessment is the basis for taxes payable in the
year following the year in which the reassessment is to be
completed.
(8) The reassessment plan must specify the dates by which the
assessor must submit land values under section 13.6 of this
chapter to the county property tax assessment board of appeals.
(9) The department may not approve the reassessment plan until
the assessor provides verification that the land values
determination under section 13.6 of this chapter has been
completed.
(10) Subject to review and approval by the department of local
government finance, the county assessor may modify the
reassessment plan.
(b) (c) A county may submit a reassessment plan that provides for
reassessing more than twenty-five percent (25%) of all parcels of real
property in the county in a particular year. A plan may provide that all
parcels are to be reassessed in one (1) year. However, a plan must
cover a four (4) year period. All real property in each group of parcels
shall be reassessed under the county's reassessment plan once during
each reassessment cycle.
(c) (d) The reassessment of the first group of parcels under a
county's reassessment plan shall begin on July 1, 2014, and shall be
completed on or before January 1, 2015.
(d) (e) The department of local government finance may adopt rules
to govern the reassessment of property under county reassessment
plans.
SECTION 12. IC 6-1.1-4-4.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.230-2025,
SECTION 19, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4.5. (a) Beginning after December 31, 2026, and
ending with the assessment date on which the department first
begins conducting assessments using the automated valuation
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


model system under IC 6-1.1-2.5-1, only agricultural land shall be
subject to annual adjustments under this section. All other tangible
real property, other than agricultural land, shall not be subject to
annual adjustments under this section, beginning after December
31, 2026, and ending with the assessment date on which the
department first begins conducting assessments using the
automated valuation model system under IC 6-1.1-2.5-1.
(a) (b) The department of local government finance shall adopt rules
establishing a system for annually adjusting the assessed value of real
property to account for changes in value in those years since a
reassessment under section 4.2 of this chapter for the property last took
effect.
(b) (c) Subject to subsection (f), subsections (a) and (g), the system
must be applied to adjust assessed values beginning with the 2006
assessment date and each year thereafter that is not a year in which a
reassessment under section 4.2 of this chapter for the property becomes
effective.
(c) (d) The rules adopted under subsection (a) (b) must include the
following characteristics in the system:
(1) Promote uniform and equal assessment of real property within
and across classifications.
(2) Require that assessing officials:
(A) reevaluate the factors that affect value;
(B) express the interactions of those factors mathematically;
(C) use mass appraisal techniques to estimate updated property
values within statistical measures of accuracy; and
(D) provide notice to taxpayers of an assessment increase that
results from the application of annual adjustments.
(3) Prescribe procedures that permit the application of the
adjustment percentages in an efficient manner by assessing
officials.
(d) (e) The department of local government finance must review and
certify each annual adjustment determined under this section.
(e) (f) For an assessment beginning after December 31, 2022,
agricultural improvements such as but not limited to barns, grain bins,
or silos on land assessed as agricultural shall not be adjusted using
factors, such as neighborhood delineation, that are appropriate for use
in adjusting residential, commercial, and industrial real property. Those
portions of agricultural parcels that include land and buildings not used
for an agricultural purpose, such as homes, homesites, and excess
residential land and commercial or industrial land and buildings, shall
be adjusted by the factor or factors developed for other similar property
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


within the geographic stratification. The residential portion of
agricultural properties shall be adjusted by the factors applied to
similar residential purposes.
(f) (g) In making the annual determination of the base rate to satisfy
the requirement for an annual adjustment for each assessment date, the
department of local government finance shall, not later than March 1
of each year, determine the base rate using the methodology reflected
in Table 2-18 of Book 1, Chapter 2 of the department of local
government finance's Real Property Assessment Guidelines (as in
effect on January 1, 2005), except that the department shall adjust the
methodology as follows:
(1) Use a six (6) year rolling average adjusted under subdivision
(3) instead of a four (4) year rolling average.
(2) Use the data from the six (6) most recent years preceding the
year in which the assessment date occurs for which data is
available, before one (1) of those six (6) years is eliminated under
subdivision (3) when determining the rolling average.
(3) Eliminate in the calculation of the rolling average the year
among the six (6) years for which the highest market value in use
of agricultural land is determined.
(4) After determining a preliminary base rate that would apply for
the assessment date without applying the adjustment under this
subdivision, the department of local government finance shall
adjust the preliminary base rate as follows:
(A) If the preliminary base rate for the assessment date would
be at least ten percent (10%) greater than the final base rate
determined for the preceding assessment date, a capitalization
rate of:
(i) for purposes of determining the preliminary base rate for
the January 1, 2025, and the January 1, 2026, assessment
dates, nine percent (9%); and
(ii) for purposes of determining the preliminary base rate for
assessment dates before January 1, 2025, and for assessment
dates after December 31, 2026, eight percent (8%);
shall be used to determine the final base rate.
(B) If the preliminary base rate for the assessment date would
be at least ten percent (10%) less than the final base rate
determined for the preceding assessment date, a capitalization
rate of six percent (6%) shall be used to determine the final
base rate.
(C) If neither clause (A) nor clause (B) applies, a capitalization
rate of seven percent (7%) shall be used to determine the final
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


base rate.
(D) In the case of a market value in use for a year that is used
in the calculation of the six (6) year rolling average under
subdivision (1) for purposes of determining the base rate for
the assessment date:
(i) that market value in use shall be recalculated by using the
capitalization rate determined under clauses (A) through (C)
for the calculation of the base rate for the assessment date;
and
(ii) the market value in use recalculated under item (i) shall
be used in the calculation of the six (6) year rolling average
under subdivision (1).
(g) (h) For assessment dates after December 31, 2009, an
adjustment in the assessed value of real property under this section
shall be based on the estimated true tax value of the property on the
assessment date that is the basis for taxes payable on that real property.
(h) (i) The department shall release the department's annual
determination of the base rate on or before March 1 of each year.
(i) (j) For the January 1, 2025, assessment date only, the base rate
determined using the capitalization rate under subsection (f)(4)(A)(i)
(g)(4)(A)(i) shall not apply to land that is assessed under section 12 of
this chapter.
SECTION 13. IC 6-1.1-4-27.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.5-2015,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 27.5. (a) The auditor of each county shall
establish a property reassessment fund. The county treasurer shall
deposit all collections resulting from the property taxes that the county
levies for the county's property reassessment fund.
(b) With respect to a reassessment of real property under a county's
reassessment plan under section 4.2 of this chapter, the county council
of each county shall, for property taxes due each year, levy against all
the taxable property in the county an amount equal to the estimated
costs of the reassessment under section 28.5 of this chapter for the
group of parcels to be reassessed in that year.
(c) The county assessor may petition the county fiscal body to
increase the levy under subsection (b) to pay for the costs of:
(1) a reassessment of one (1) or more groups of parcels under a
county's reassessment plan prepared under section 4.2 of this
chapter;
(2) verification under 50 IAC 27-4-7 of sales disclosure forms
forwarded to the county assessor under IC 6-1.1-5.5-3; or
(3) processing annual adjustments under section 4.5 of this
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


chapter.
The assessor must document the needs and reasons for the increased
funding.
(d) This subsection applies to an assessment date after
December 31, 2026, and ending before the department begins
conducting assessments using the automated valuation model
system under IC 6-1.1-2.5-1. If a county fiscal body increased the
levy under subsection (b) to pay for the costs of processing annual
adjustments under section 4.5 of this chapter, the county fiscal
body shall reduce the levy under subsection (b) by an amount equal
to:
(1) the amount of the prior increase imposed to pay for the
costs of processing annual adjustments before January 1,
2027; minus
(2) the relative amount of the prior increase in subdivision (1)
that is attributable to the costs of processing annual
adjustments for agricultural land under section 4.5 of this
chapter.
(d) (e) If the county fiscal body denies a petition under subsection
(c), the county assessor may appeal to the department of local
government finance. The department of local government finance shall:
(1) hear the appeal; and
(2) determine whether the additional levy is necessary.
SECTION 14. IC 6-1.1-15-1.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.9-2024,
SECTION 167, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 1.1. (a) A taxpayer may appeal
an assessment of a taxpayer's tangible property by filing a notice in
writing with, before May 10, 2026, the township assessor, or the
county assessor if the township is not served by a township assessor,
and after May 9, 2026, with the county auditor. Except as provided
in subsections (e) and (h), an appeal under this section may raise any
claim of an error related to the following:
(1) The assessed value of the property.
(2) The assessment was against the wrong person.
(3) The approval denial or omission of a deduction, credit,
exemption, abatement, or tax cap.
(4) A clerical, mathematical, or typographical mistake.
(5) The description of the real property.
(6) The legality or constitutionality of a property tax or
assessment.
A written notice under this section must be made on a form designated
by the department of local government finance. A taxpayer must file a
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


separate petition for each parcel.
(b) A taxpayer may appeal an error in the assessed value of the
property under subsection (a)(1) any time after the official's action, but
not later than the following:
(1) For assessments before January 1, 2019, the earlier of:
(A) forty-five (45) days after the date on which the notice of
assessment is mailed by the county; or
(B) forty-five (45) days after the date on which the tax
statement is mailed by the county treasurer, regardless of
whether the assessing official changes the taxpayer's
assessment.
(2) For assessments of real property, after December 31, 2018, the
earlier of:
(A) June 15 of the assessment year, if the notice of assessment
is mailed by the county before May 1 of the assessment year;
or
(B) June 15 of the year in which the tax statement is mailed by
the county treasurer, if the notice of assessment is mailed by
the county on or after May 1 of the assessment year.
(3) For assessments of personal property, forty-five (45) days after
the date on which the county mails the notice under
IC 6-1.1-3-20.
A taxpayer may appeal an error in the assessment under subsection
(a)(2), (a)(3), (a)(4), (a)(5), or (a)(6) not later than three (3) years after
the taxes were first due.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (d), an appeal under this
section applies only to the tax year corresponding to the tax statement
or other notice of action.
(d) An appeal under this section applies to a prior tax year if a
county official took action regarding a prior tax year, and such action
is reflected for the first time in the tax statement. A taxpayer who has
timely filed a written notice of appeal under this section may be
required to file a petition for each tax year, and each petition filed later
must be considered timely.
(e) A taxpayer may not appeal under this section any claim of error
related to the following:
(1) The denial of a deduction, exemption, abatement, or credit if
the authority to approve or deny is not vested in the county board,
county auditor, county assessor, or township assessor.
(2) The calculation of interest and penalties.
(3) A matter under subsection (a) if a separate appeal or review
process is statutorily prescribed.
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


However, a claim may be raised under this section regarding the
omission or application of a deduction approved by an authority other
than the county board, county auditor, county assessor, or township
assessor.
(f) The filing of a written notice under this section constitutes a
request by the taxpayer for a preliminary informal meeting with:
(1) in the case of a notice filed before May 10, 2026, the
township assessor, or the county assessor if the township is not
served by a township assessor; and
(2) in the case of a notice filed after May 9, 2026, the county
auditor.
(g) A county or township official, or county auditor, as applicable,
who receives a written notice under this section shall forward the
notice to:
(1) the county board; and
(2) in the case of a notice filed with a county or township
official before May 10, 2026, the county auditor. if the taxpayer
raises a claim regarding a matter that is in the discretion of the
county auditor.
(h) A taxpayer may not raise any claim in an appeal under this
section related to the legality or constitutionality of:
(1) a user fee (as defined in IC 33-23-1-10.5);
(2) any other charge, fee, or rate imposed by a political
subdivision under any other law; or
(3) any tax imposed by a political subdivision other than a
property tax.
(i) This subsection applies only to an appeal based on a claim of
error in the determination of property that is or is not eligible for a
standard homestead deduction under IC 6-1.1-12-37 and only for an
assessment date occurring before January 1, 2024. A taxpayer may
appeal an error in the assessment of property as described in this
subsection any time after the official's action, but not later than one (1)
year after the date on which the property that is the subject of the
appeal was assessed.
SECTION 15. IC 6-1.1-15-1.2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.9-2024,
SECTION 168, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 1.2. (a) A county or township
official, or county auditor, as applicable, who receives a written
notice under section 1.1 of this chapter shall schedule, at a time during
business hours that is convenient to the taxpayer, a preliminary
informal meeting with the taxpayer in order to resolve the appeal. If the
taxpayer raises a claim regarding a matter that is in the discretion of the
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


county auditor, the An informal meeting held after May 9, 2026, must
include the county auditor, if the county auditor did not receive the
written notice under section 1.1 of this chapter. At the preliminary
informal meeting, in order to facilitate understanding and the resolution
of disputed issues:
(1) a county or township official;
(2) the county auditor; if the matter is in the discretion of the
county auditor; and
(3) the taxpayer;
shall exchange the information that each party is relying on at the time
of the preliminary informal meeting to support the party's respective
position on each disputed issue concerning the assessment or
deduction. If additional information is obtained by the county or
township official, the county auditor, or the taxpayer after the
preliminary informal meeting and before the hearing held by the county
board, the party obtaining the information shall provide the information
to the other party. If the county or township official, the county auditor,
or the taxpayer obtains additional information and provides the
information to the other party for the first time at the hearing held by
the county board, the county board, unless waived by the receiving
party, shall continue the hearing until a future hearing date of the
county board so that the receiving party has an opportunity to review
all the information that the offering party is relying on to support the
offering party's positions on the disputed issues concerning the
assessment or deduction.
(b) The official or county auditor, as applicable, shall report on a
form prescribed by the department of local government finance the
results of the informal meeting. If the taxpayer and the official or
county auditor, as applicable, agree on the resolution of all issues in
the appeal, the report shall state the agreed resolution of the matter and
be signed by the official or county auditor, as applicable, and the
taxpayer. If an informal meeting is not held, or the informal meeting is
unsuccessful, the official or county auditor, as applicable, shall
report those facts on the form. The official or county auditor, as
applicable, shall forward the report on the informal meeting to the
county board.
(c) If the county board receives a report on the informal meeting
indicating an agreed resolution of the matter, the county board shall
vote to accept or deny the agreed resolution. If the county board accepts
the agreed resolution, the county board shall issue a notification of final
assessment determination adopting the agreed resolution and vacating
the hearing if scheduled.
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


(d) The county board, upon receipt of a written notice under section
1.1 of this chapter, shall hold a hearing on the appeal not later than one
hundred eighty (180) days after the filing date of the written notice.
The county board shall, by mail, give at least thirty (30) days notice of
the date, time, and place fixed for the hearing to the taxpayer, the
county or township official with whom the taxpayer filed the written
notice, and the county auditor. If the county board has notice that the
taxpayer is represented by a third person, any hearing notice shall be
mailed to the representative.
(e) If good cause is shown, the county board shall grant a request for
continuance filed in writing at least ten (10) days before the hearing,
and reschedule the hearing under subsection (d).
(f) A taxpayer may withdraw an appeal by filing a written request
at least ten (10) days before the hearing. The county board shall issue
a notification of final assessment determination indicating the
withdrawal and no change in the assessment. A withdrawal waives a
taxpayer's right to appeal to the Indiana board.
(g) The county board shall determine an appeal without a hearing if
requested by the taxpayer in writing at least twenty (20) days before the
hearing.
(h) If a taxpayer appeals the assessment of tangible property under
section 1.1 of this chapter, the taxpayer is not required to have an
appraisal of the property in order to initiate the appeal or prosecute the
appeal. If the taxpayer presents an appraisal to the county board that:
(1) is prepared by a certified appraiser in compliance with the
Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice to
determine the market value in use;
(2) is addressed to the property owner or the assessor's office;
(3) is commissioned for the purpose of the assessment appeal; and
(4) has an effective date that is the same date as the date of the
assessment that is the subject of the appeal;
the value of the property contained in the appraisal is presumed to be
correct. If the county board disagrees with the taxpayer's appraisal, the
county board may seek review of the appraisal by a third party
independent certified appraiser or obtain an independent appraisal
report conducted by a certified appraiser in compliance with the
Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice. If the county
board's appraisal differs from the taxpayer's appraisal, the county board
shall weigh the evidence and determine the true tax value of the
property based on the totality of the probative evidence before the
county board. The county board's determination of the property's true
tax value may be higher or lower than the assessment but may not be
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


lower than the lowest appraisal presented to or obtained by the county
board, or higher than the highest appraisal presented to or obtained by
the county board. After the assignment of value, the parties shall retain
their rights to appeal the assessment or assessments to the Indiana
board, which must hear the appeal de novo.
(i) At a hearing under subsection (d), the taxpayer shall have the
opportunity to present testimony and evidence regarding the matters on
appeal. If the matters on appeal are in the discretion of the county
auditor, The county auditor or the county auditor's representative shall
attend the hearing. A county or township official, or the county auditor
or the county auditor's representative, shall have an opportunity to
present testimony and evidence regarding the matters on appeal. The
county board may adjourn and continue the hearing to a later date in
order to make a physical inspection or consider the evidence presented.
(j) The county board shall determine the assessment by motion and
majority vote. Except as provided in subsection (m), a county board
may, based on the evidence before it, increase an assessment. The
county board shall issue a written decision. Written notice of the
decision shall be given to the township official, county official, county
auditor, and the taxpayer.
(k) If more than one hundred eighty (180) days have passed since
the date the notice of appeal was filed, and the county board has not
issued a determination, a taxpayer may initiate any appeal with the
Indiana board of tax review under section 3 of this chapter.
(l) The county assessor or county auditor, as applicable, may
assess a penalty of fifty dollars ($50) against the taxpayer if the
taxpayer or representative fails to appear at a hearing under subsection
(d) and, under subsection (e), the taxpayer's request for continuance is
denied, or the taxpayer's request for continuance, request for the board
to take action without a hearing, or withdrawal is not timely filed. A
taxpayer may appeal the assessment of the penalty to the Indiana board
or directly to the tax court. The penalty may not be added as an amount
owed on the property tax statement under IC 6-1.1-22 or IC 6-1.1-22.5.
(m) The determination of an appealed assessed value of tangible
property by a county or township official, or county auditor, as
applicable, resulting from an informal meeting under subsection (a),
or by a county board resulting from an appeal hearing under subsection
(d), may be less than or equal to the tangible property's original
appealed assessed value at issue, but may not exceed the original
appealed assessed value at issue. However, an increase in assessed
value that is attributable to substantial renovation, new improvements,
zoning change, or use change is excluded from the limitation under this
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


subsection.
SECTION 16. IC 6-1.1-15-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.230-2025,
SECTION 39, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 3. (a) A taxpayer may obtain a review by the
Indiana board of:
(1) a county board's action with respect to a claim under section
1.1 of this chapter; or
(2) a denial by the county auditor, the county assessor, or the
county treasurer of a claim for refund under IC 6-1.1-9-10(c)(2)
that is appealed to the Indiana board as authorized in
IC 6-1.1-26-2.1(d)(2).
(b) The county assessor is the party (before the abolishment of the
office) and the county auditor are parties to a review under
subsection (a)(1) to defend the determination of the county board. The
county auditor may appear as an additional party to the review if the
determination concerns a matter that is in the discretion of the county
auditor. At the time the notice of that determination is given to the
taxpayer, the taxpayer shall also be informed in writing of:
(1) the taxpayer's opportunity for review under subsection (a)(1);
and
(2) the procedures the taxpayer must follow in order to obtain
review under this section.
(c) A county assessor or county auditor who dissents from the
determination of the county board may obtain a review by the Indiana
board. A county auditor who dissents from the determination of the
county board concerning a matter that is in the discretion of the county
auditor may obtain a review by the Indiana board.
(d) In order to obtain a review by the Indiana board under
subsection (a)(1), the party must, not later than forty-five (45) days
after the date of the notice given to the party or parties of the
determination of the county board:
(1) file a petition for review with the Indiana board; and
(2) serve a copy of the petition on the other party.
(e) The Indiana board shall prescribe the form of the petition for
review under this chapter. The Indiana board shall issue instructions for
completion of the form. The form and the instructions must be clear,
simple, and understandable to the average individual. A petition for
review of such a determination must be made on the form prescribed
by the Indiana board. The form must require the petitioner to specify
the reasons why the petitioner believes that the determination by the
county board is erroneous.
(f) If the action for which a taxpayer seeks review under this section
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


is the assessment of tangible property, the taxpayer is not required to
have an appraisal of the property in order to do the following:
(1) Initiate the review.
(2) Prosecute the review.
(g) If an owner petitions the Indiana board under IC 6-1.1-11-7(d),
the Indiana board is authorized to approve or disapprove an exemption
application:
(1) previously submitted to a county board under IC 6-1.1-11-6;
and
(2) that is not approved or disapproved by the county board within
one hundred eighty (180) days after the owner filed the
application for exemption under IC 6-1.1-11.
The county assessor is a party (before the abolishment of the office)
and after May 9, 2026, the county auditor are parties to a petition
to the Indiana board under IC 6-1.1-11-7(d).
(h) This subsection applies only to the review by the Indiana board
of a denial of a refund claim described in subsection (a)(2). The county
assessor is the party (before the abolishment of the office) and after
May 9, 2026, the county auditor are parties to a review under
subsection (a)(2) to defend the denial of the refund under
IC 6-1.1-26-2.1. In order to obtain a review by the Indiana board under
subsection (a)(2), the taxpayer must, within forty-five (45) days of the
notice of denial under IC 6-1.1-26-2.1(d):
(1) file a petition for review with the Indiana board; and
(2) serve a copy of the petition on the county auditor.
SECTION 17. IC 6-1.1-15-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.230-2025,
SECTION 40, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 4. (a) After receiving a petition for review
which is filed under section 3 of this chapter, the Indiana board shall
conduct a hearing at its earliest opportunity. The Indiana board may
correct any errors related to a claim under section 1.1 of this chapter
that is within the jurisdiction of the Indiana board under IC 6-1.5-4-1.
(b) If the Indiana board conducts a site inspection of the property as
part of its review of the petition, the Indiana board shall give notice to
all parties of the date and time of the site inspection. The Indiana board
is not required to assess the property in question. The Indiana board
shall give notice of the date fixed for the hearing, by mail, to the parties
or a party's representative. The Indiana board shall give these notices
at least thirty (30) days before the day fixed for the hearing unless the
parties agree to a shorter period. With respect to a petition for review
filed by a county assessor or county auditor, the county board that
made the determination under review under this section may file an
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


amicus curiae brief in the review proceeding under this section. The
expenses incurred by the county board in filing the amicus curiae brief
shall be paid from the property reassessment fund under
IC 6-1.1-4-27.5 of the county in which the property is located. The
executive of a taxing unit may file an amicus curiae brief in the review
proceeding under this section if the property that is the subject of the
appeal is subject to assessment by that taxing unit.
(c) If a petition for review does not comply with the Indiana board's
instructions for completing the form prescribed under section 3 of this
chapter, the Indiana board shall serve a notice describing the defect in
the petition. The petitioner then has thirty (30) days from the date on
the notice to cure the defect and file a corrected petition. The Indiana
board shall deny a corrected petition for review if it does not
substantially comply with the Indiana board's instructions for
completing the form prescribed under section 3 of this chapter.
(d) After the hearing, the Indiana board shall give the parties and
any entity that filed an amicus curiae brief, or their representatives:
(1) notice of its final determination; and
(2) for parties entitled to appeal the final determination, notice of
the procedures they must follow in order to obtain court review
under section 5 of this chapter.
(e) The Indiana board shall conduct a hearing not later than one (1)
year after a petition in proper form is filed with the Indiana board.
(f) The Indiana board shall issue a determination not later than the
later of:
(1) ninety (90) days after the hearing; or
(2) the date set in an extension order issued by the Indiana board.
The board may not extend the date by more than one hundred
eighty (180) days.
(g) The time periods described in subsections (e) and (f) do not
include any period of time that is attributable to a party's:
(1) request for a continuance, stay, extension, or summary
disposition;
(2) consent to a case management order, stipulated record, or
proposed hearing date;
(3) failure to comply with the board's orders or rules; or
(4) waiver of a deadline.
(h) If the Indiana board fails to take action required under
subsection (e) or (f), the entity that initiated the petition may:
(1) take no action and wait for the Indiana board to hear the
matter and issue a final determination; or
(2) petition for judicial review under section 5 of this chapter.
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


(i) This subsection applies when the board has not held a hearing.
A person may not seek judicial review under subsection (h)(2) until:
(1) the person requests a hearing in writing; and
(2) sixty (60) days have passed after the person requests a hearing
under subdivision (1) and the matter has not been heard or
otherwise extended under subsection (g).
(j) A final determination must include separately stated findings of
fact for all aspects of the determination. Findings of ultimate fact must
be accompanied by a concise statement of the underlying basic facts of
record to support the findings. Findings must be based exclusively
upon the evidence on the record in the proceeding and on matters
officially noticed in the proceeding. Findings must be based upon a
preponderance of the evidence.
(k) The Indiana board may limit the scope of the appeal to the issues
raised in the petition and the evaluation of the evidence presented to
the county board in support of those issues only if all parties
participating in the hearing required under subsection (a) agree to the
limitation. A party participating in the hearing required under
subsection (a) is entitled to introduce evidence that is otherwise proper
and admissible without regard to whether that evidence has previously
been introduced at a hearing before the county board.
(l) The Indiana board may require the parties to the appeal:
(1) to file not more than five (5) business days before the date of
the hearing required under subsection (a) documentary evidence
or summaries of statements of testimonial evidence; and
(2) to file not more than fifteen (15) business days before the date
of the hearing required under subsection (a) lists of witnesses and
exhibits to be introduced at the hearing.
(m) A party to a proceeding before the Indiana board shall provide
to all other parties to the proceeding the information described in
subsection (l) if the other party requests the information in writing at
least ten (10) days before the deadline for filing of the information
under subsection (l).
(n) The Indiana board may base its final determination on a
stipulation between the respondent and the petitioner. If the final
determination is based on a stipulated assessed valuation of tangible
property, the Indiana board may order the placement of a notation on
the permanent assessment record of the tangible property that the
assessed valuation was determined by stipulation. The Indiana board
may:
(1) order that a final determination under this subsection has no
precedential value; or
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


(2) specify a limited precedential value of a final determination
under this subsection.
(o) If a party to a proceeding, or a party's authorized representative,
elects to receive any notice under this section electronically, the notice
is considered effective in the same manner as if the notice had been
sent by United States mail, with postage prepaid, to the party's or
representative's mailing address of record.
(p) At a hearing under this section, the Indiana board shall admit
into evidence an appraisal report, prepared by an appraiser, unless the
appraisal report is ruled inadmissible on grounds besides a hearsay
objection. This exception to the hearsay rule shall not be construed to
limit the discretion of the Indiana board, as trier of fact, to review the
probative value of an appraisal report.
SECTION 18. IC 6-1.1-15-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.156-2020,
SECTION 18, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 5. (a) Not later than fifteen (15) days after the
Indiana board gives notice of its final determination under section 4 of
this chapter to the party or the maximum allowable time for the
issuance of a final determination by the Indiana board under section 4
of this chapter expires, a party to the proceeding may request a
rehearing before the Indiana board. The Indiana board may conduct a
rehearing and affirm or modify its final determination, giving the same
notices after the rehearing as are required by section 4 of this chapter.
The Indiana board has fifteen (15) days after receiving a petition for a
rehearing to determine whether to grant a rehearing. Failure to grant a
rehearing not later than fifteen (15) days after receiving the petition
shall be treated as a final determination to deny the petition. A petition
for a rehearing does not toll the time in which to file a petition for
judicial review unless the petition for rehearing is granted. If the
Indiana board determines to rehear a final determination, the Indiana
board:
(1) may conduct the additional hearings that the Indiana board
determines necessary or review the written record without
additional hearings; and
(2) shall issue a final determination not later than ninety (90) days
after notifying the parties that the Indiana board will rehear the
final determination.
If the Indiana board fails to make a final determination within the time
allowed under subdivision (2), the entity that initiated the petition for
rehearing may take no action and wait for the Indiana board to make a
final determination or petition for judicial review under subsection (g).
(b) A party may petition for judicial review of the final
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


determination of the Indiana board. In order to obtain judicial review
under this section, a party must:
(1) file a petition with the Indiana tax court;
(2) serve a copy of the petition on:
(A) the parties to the review by the Indiana board;
(B) the attorney general; and
(C) any entity that filed an amicus curiae brief with the Indiana
board; and
(3) file a written notice of appeal with the Indiana board
informing the Indiana board of the party's intent to obtain judicial
review.
Petitions for judicial review may be consolidated at the request of the
appellants if it can be done in the interest of justice. The department of
local government finance may intervene in an action taken under this
subsection if the interpretation of a rule of the department is at issue in
the action. The county assessor (before the abolishment of the office)
and after May 9, 2026, the county auditor, is a party are parties to
the review under this section.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (g), to initiate a proceeding for
judicial review under this section, a party must take the action required
by subsection (b) not later than:
(1) forty-five (45) days after the Indiana board gives the person
notice of its final determination, unless a rehearing is conducted
under subsection (a); or
(2) forty-five (45) days after the Indiana board gives the person
notice under subsection (a) of its final determination, if a
rehearing is conducted under subsection (a) or the maximum time
elapses for the Indiana board to make a determination under this
section.
(d) The failure of the Indiana board to conduct a hearing within the
period prescribed in section 4(e) of this chapter does not constitute
notice to the party of an Indiana board final determination.
(e) The county assessor or county auditor may petition for judicial
review to the tax court in the manner prescribed in this section. If the
county auditor appeared before the Indiana board concerning the
matter, the county auditor may petition for judicial review to the tax
court in the manner prescribed in this section.
(f) The county assessor or county auditor may not be represented
by the attorney general in a judicial review initiated under subsection
(b) by the county assessor or county auditor.
(g) If the maximum time elapses for the Indiana board to give notice
of its final determination under subsection (a) or section 4 of this
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


chapter, a party may initiate a proceeding for judicial review by taking
the action required by subsection (b) at any time after the maximum
time elapses. If:
(1) a judicial proceeding is initiated under this subsection; and
(2) the Indiana board has not issued a determination;
the tax court shall determine the matter de novo.
SECTION 19. IC 6-1.1-15-19, AS ADDED BY P.L.244-2015,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 19. (a) Before July 1, 2026, a county
assessor, and after June 30, 2026, a county auditor, shall quarterly
send a notice to the fiscal officer of each taxing unit affected by an
appeal prosecuted under this chapter, including the fiscal officer of an
affected redevelopment commission established under IC 36-7. The
notice must include the following information:
(1) The date on which a notice for review was filed.
(2) The name and address of the taxpayer who filed the notice for
review.
(3) The assessed value for the assessment date the year before the
appeal, and the assessed value on the most recent assessment
date.
(4) The status of the taxpayer's appeal.
(b) Each township assessor (if any) shall furnish to the county
assessor all requested information necessary for purposes of providing
the quarterly notices under this section.
(c) A notice required by this section may be provided to the
appropriate fiscal officer in an electronic format.
SECTION 20. IC 6-1.1-17-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 55, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) The proper officers of a political subdivision
shall formulate its estimated budget and its proposed tax rate and tax
levy on the form prescribed by the department of local government
finance and approved by the state board of accounts. In formulating a
political subdivision's estimated budget under this section, the proper
officers of the political subdivision must consider the net property tax
revenue that will be collected by the political subdivision during the
ensuing year, after taking into account the estimate by the department
of local government finance under IC 6-1.1-20.6-11.1 of the amount by
which the political subdivision's distribution of property taxes will be
reduced by credits under IC 6-1.1-20.6-9.5 in the ensuing year, after
taking into account the estimate by the department of local government
finance under section 0.7 of this chapter of the maximum amount of net
property tax revenue and miscellaneous revenue that the political
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


subdivision will receive in the ensuing year, and after taking into
account all payments for debt service obligations that are to be made
by the political subdivision during the ensuing year. The political
subdivision or appropriate fiscal body, if the political subdivision is
subject to section 20 of this chapter, shall submit the following
information to the department's computer gateway:
(1) The estimated budget.
(2) The estimated maximum permissible levy, as provided by the
department under IC 6-1.1-18.5-24.
(3) The current and proposed tax levies of each fund.
(4) The percentage change between the current and proposed tax
levies of each fund.
(5) The amount by which the political subdivision's distribution
of property taxes may be reduced by credits granted under
IC 6-1.1-20.6, as estimated by the department of local government
finance under IC 6-1.1-20.6-11.1.
(6) The amounts of excessive levy appeals to be requested.
(7) The time and place at which the political subdivision or
appropriate fiscal body will hold a public hearing on the items
described in subdivisions (1) through (6).
(8) The amount of any increase in the tax rate and tax levies of the
political subdivision in an ordinance adopted under section 23 of
this chapter.
(9) The time and place at which the political subdivision or
appropriate fiscal body will meet to fix the budget, tax rate, and
levy under section 5 of this chapter.
(10) The date, time, and place of the final adoption of the budget,
tax rate, and levy under section 5 of this chapter.
Except as provided in section 5.6(b) of this chapter, the political
subdivision or appropriate fiscal body shall submit this information to
the department's computer gateway at least ten (10) days before the
public hearing required by this subsection in the manner prescribed by
the department. If the date, time, or place of the final adoption
subsequently changes, the political subdivision shall update the
information submitted to the department's computer gateway. The
department shall make this information available to taxpayers, at least
ten (10) days before the public hearing, through its computer gateway
and provide a telephone number through which taxpayers may request
mailed copies of a political subdivision's information under this
subsection. The department's computer gateway must allow a taxpayer
to search for the information under this subsection by the taxpayer's
address. The department shall review only the submission to the
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


department's computer gateway for compliance with this section.
(b) The board of directors of a solid waste management district
established under IC 13-21 or IC 13-9.5-2 (before its repeal) may
conduct the public hearing required under subsection (a):
(1) in any county of the solid waste management district; and
(2) in accordance with the annual notice of meetings published
under IC 13-21-5-2.
(c) The trustee of each township in the county before January 1,
2027, and the board of county commissioners, after December 31,
2026, shall estimate the amount necessary to meet the cost of township
assistance in the township for the ensuing calendar year. The township
board shall, subject to section 23 of this chapter, adopt with the
township budget a tax rate sufficient to meet the estimated cost of
township assistance. The taxes collected as a result of the tax rate
adopted under this subsection are credited to the township assistance
fund.
(d) A political subdivision for which any of the information under
subsection (a) is not submitted to the department's computer gateway
in the manner prescribed by the department shall have its most recent
annual appropriations and annual tax levy continued for the ensuing
budget year.
(e) If a political subdivision or appropriate fiscal body timely
submits the information under subsection (a) but subsequently
discovers the information contains an error, the political subdivision or
appropriate fiscal body may submit amended information to the
department's computer gateway. However, submission of an
amendment to information described in subsection (a)(1) through (a)(7)
must occur at least ten (10) days before the public hearing held under
subsection (a), and submission of an amendment to information
described in subsection (a)(8) through (a)(9) must occur at least
twenty-four (24) hours before the time in which the meeting to fix the
budget, tax rate, and levy was originally advertised to commence.
(f) Each year, the governing body of a school corporation that
imposes property taxes to pay debt service on bonds or lease rentals on
a lease for a controlled project under IC 6-1.1-20, property taxes under
an operating referendum tax levy under IC 20-46-1, or property taxes
under a school safety referendum tax levy under IC 20-46-9, shall
submit the following information at least ten (10) days before the
public hearing required by subsection (a) in the manner prescribed by
the department:
(1) the purposes specified in the public question submitted to the
voters or any revenue spending plans adopted under
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


IC 6-1.1-20-13, IC 20-46-1-8, or IC 20-46-9-6 for:
(A) debt service on bonds or lease rentals on a lease for a
controlled project under IC 6-1.1-20;
(B) an operating referendum tax levy approved by the voters
of the school corporation under IC 20-46-1; or
(C) a school safety referendum tax levy approved by the voters
of the school corporation under IC 20-46-9;
as applicable; and
(2) the debt service levy fund, operating referendum tax levy
fund, or school safety referendum tax levy fund of the school
corporation, whichever is applicable;
to show whether the school corporation is using revenue collected from
the referendum tax levy in the amounts and for the purposes
established in the purposes specified in the public question submitted
to the voters or the revenue spending plan, as applicable. The
department shall make this information available to taxpayers at least
ten (10) days before the public hearing.
SECTION 21. IC 6-1.1-18.5-22 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 22. (a) For purposes of
determining the property tax levy limit imposed on a county under
section 3 of this chapter, the county ad valorem property tax levy
for a particular calendar year does not include the amount, if any,
of ad valorem property taxes imposed for township assistance. A
separate maximum permissible ad valorem property tax levy for
township assistance shall be determined as provided in this section
for 2027 and thereafter.
(b) The county's maximum permissible ad valorem property tax
levy for township assistance for property taxes first due and
payable in 2027 is equal to the result of:
(1) the total amount of property taxes levied for township
assistance by all townships in the county for property taxes
first due and payable in 2026; multiplied by
(2) the maximum levy growth quotient determined under
section 2 of this chapter for 2027.
(c) The county's maximum permissible ad valorem property tax
levy for township assistance for property taxes for an ensuing
calendar year after 2027 is equal to the result of:
(1) the county's maximum permissible ad valorem property
tax levy for township assistance determined under this section
for the current calendar year; multiplied by
(2) the maximum levy growth quotient determined under
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


section 2 of this chapter for the ensuing calendar year.
SECTION 22. IC 6-1.1-30-21 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 21. (a) The department shall
develop an automated valuation model system for the assessment
of all tangible property except agricultural land using data that is
readily available to the public.
(b) The department shall present a plan of implementation for
an automated valuation model system to the interim study
committee on fiscal policy before November 1, 2026, and provide
an update to the interim study committee on fiscal policy on the
progress of the implementation before November 1 in subsequent
years until the automated valuation model system is operational
for use.
(c) The interim study committee on fiscal policy shall
recommend legislation to implement an automated valuation model
system of statewide assessment following presentation by the
department that the automated valuation model system is
operational for use.
SECTION 23. IC 6-1.1-51.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]:
Chapter 51.5. Property Tax Liability Credit
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "property tax liability" means
liability for the tax imposed on property under this article
determined after application of all credits and deductions under
this article, but does not include any interest or penalty imposed
under this article.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "taxable property" means all
tangible property that is subject to the tax imposed by this article
and is not exempt from tax under IC 6-1.1-10 or any other law. The
term includes a mobile home or manufactured home that is not
assessed as real property that an individual uses as the individual's
residence.
Sec. 3. This section applies for taxes first due and payable in
2028 through the first date that taxes are first due and payable
based on assessments under the automated valuation model system
in IC 6-1.1-2.5-1. A credit shall be applied against a taxpayer's
property tax liability as set forth in this chapter. The amount of the
credit under this section is equal to:
(1) for taxes first due and payable in 2028, the lesser of:
(A) the property tax liability first due and payable on the
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


property for the calendar year; or
(B) the property tax liability imposed on the taxpayer's
property for taxes first due and payable in 2026; and
(2) for taxes first due and payable in 2029 and thereafter the
greater of zero (0) or the result of:
(A) the property tax liability first due and payable on the
property for the calendar year; minus
(B) the result of:
(i) the property tax liability first due and payable on the
property for the immediately preceding year after the
application of the credit granted under this section for
that year; multiplied by
(ii) one and three-hundredths (1.03).
Sec. 4. The amount of property tax liability determined in this
chapter is the maximum property tax liability to which taxable
property is subject for taxes first due and payable in 2028 through
the first date that taxes are first due and payable based on
assessments under the automated valuation model system in
IC 6-1.1-2.5-1.
Sec. 5. The department of local government finance shall apply
the credit under this chapter to a determination of property tax
liability for all taxable property as set forth in this chapter.
SECTION 24. IC 8-23-2-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.49-2024,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 5. (a) The department, through the
commissioner or the commissioner's designee, shall:
(1) develop, continuously update, and implement:
(A) long range comprehensive transportation plans;
(B) work programs; and
(C) budgets;
to assure the orderly development and maintenance of an efficient
statewide system of transportation;
(2) implement the policies, plans, and work programs adopted by
the department;
(3) organize by creating, merging, or abolishing divisions;
(4) evaluate and utilize whenever possible improved
transportation facility maintenance and construction techniques;
(5) carry out public transportation responsibilities, including:
(A) developing and recommending public transportation
policies, plans, and work programs;
(B) providing technical assistance and guidance in the area of
public transportation to political subdivisions with public
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


transportation responsibilities;
(C) developing work programs for the utilization of federal
mass transportation funds;
(D) furnishing data from surveys, plans, specifications, and
estimates required to qualify a state agency or political
subdivision for federal mass transportation funds;
(E) conducting or participating in any public hearings to
qualify urbanized areas for an allocation of federal mass
transportation funding;
(F) serving, upon designation of the governor, as the state
agency to receive and disburse any state or federal mass
transportation funds that are not directly allocated to an
urbanized area;
(G) entering into agreements with other states, regional
agencies created in other states, and municipalities in other
states for the purpose of improving public transportation
service to the citizens; and
(H) developing and including in its own proposed
transportation plan a specialized transportation services plan
for the elderly and persons with disabilities;
(6) provide technical assistance to units of local government with
road and street responsibilities;
(7) develop, undertake, and administer the program of research
and extension required under IC 8-17-7;
(8) allow public testimony in accordance with section 17 of this
chapter whenever the department holds a public hearing (as
defined in section 17 of this chapter); and
(9) subject to section 6.5 of this chapter, adopt rules under
IC 4-22-2 to reasonably and cost effectively manage the
right-of-way of the state highway system by establishing a formal
procedure for highway improvement projects that involve the
relocation of utility facilities by providing for an exchange of
information among the department, utilities, and the department's
highway construction contractors.
(b) Rules adopted under subsection (a)(9):
(1) shall not unreasonably affect the cost, or impair the safety or
reliability, of a utility service; and
(2) must require a utility to provide information concerning all
authorized representatives of the utility for purposes of highway
improvement projects and improvement projects undertaken by
local units of government.
(c) A civil action may be prosecuted by or against the department,
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


a department highway construction contractor, or a utility to recover
costs and expenses directly resulting from willful violation of the rules.
Nothing in this section or in subsection (a)(9) shall be construed as
granting authority to the department to adopt rules establishing fines,
assessments, or other penalties for or against utilities or the
department's highway construction contractors.
(d) Based on information provided by utilities under rules described
in subsection (b)(2), the department shall establish and publish on the
department's website a searchable data base of authorized
representatives of utilities for purposes of improvement projects that
involve the relocation of utility facilities. A utility that provides
information described in subsection (b)(2) shall:
(1) update the information provided to the department on an
annual basis; and
(2) notify the department of any change in the information not
more than thirty (30) days after the change occurs.
(e) Not later than November 1 of each year, the department, through
the commissioner or the commissioner's designee, shall prepare for the
interim study committee on roads and transportation a report that
includes updates on any information requested by the study committee
to aid in the study of the study committee's assigned topics. The report
must be submitted in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6.
(f) Before October 1, 2026, the department shall develop and
implement inspection criteria for local bridge inspections
throughout the state with timelines, inspection standards, and
milestones that ensure public safety, comply with state and federal
inspection standards, and have the goal of reducing the cost of local
bridge inspections within a county. The plan shall include
exempting certain local bridges from:
(1) inspection requirements, in whole or in part;
(2) periodic reporting requirements; or
(3) any other regulatory or inspection requirement;
that the department determines will reduce costs while complying
with state and federal inspection standard. The department shall
repeal any rules adopted by the department that are inconsistent
with the implementation of the plan.
SECTION 25. IC 8-23-2-19, AS ADDED BY P.L.218-2017,
SECTION 79, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 19. (a) The department shall:
(1) establish a single statewide set of state and local road and
bridge condition metrics;
(2) use the metrics in subdivision (1) to:
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


(A) evaluate and compare state and local road and bridge
conditions in local units within Indiana; and
(B) evaluate and compare Indiana's statewide road and bridge
conditions to road and bridge conditions in states with similar
climate, soil, and traffic conditions; and
(3) develop goals, timelines, and milestones to ensure that
Indiana's:
(A) state and local road and bridge conditions; and
(B) local road conditions;
are in the top quarter of the states included in the comparison in
subdivision (2).
(b) The department shall develop a state and local road and bridge
project prioritization system and project priority list. The project
prioritization system must be based on a model that includes at least the
following variables:
(1) Safety.
(2) Congestion.
(3) Environment.
(4) Regional and state economic contribution.
(5) Potential intermodal connectivity.
(6) Total cost of ownership.
(c) The commissioner shall appoint two (2) economic professionals
and two (2) engineering professionals to establish and administer the
project prioritization system and model. The appointees:
(1) serve at the pleasure of the commissioner; and
(2) are entitled to compensation set by the budget agency.
(d) The department shall use the results of the model established
under this section to determine short term and long term budgetary
needs. The determination must achieve the following infrastructure
goals:
(1) Preserve and maintain current infrastructure resources.
(2) Provide for projected mobility needs for movement of people
and goods.
(e) The department may adjust the project priority list established
under this section if the department determines that unforeseen
circumstances require an adjustment.
(f) The general assembly may not approve or disapprove projects on
the department's project priority list.
SECTION 26. IC 12-20-1-2.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.5. The following apply:
(1) Before January 1, 2027, township assistance is
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


administered in each township. The township trustee is the
administrator of township assistance in the township.
(2) After December 31, 2026, township assistance is
administered on a county basis by the board of county
commissioners.
SECTION 27. IC 12-20-1-7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) This section applies beginning after December
31, 2026.
(b) The board of county commissioners shall administer
township assistance in the county on a countywide basis.
(c) The following apply to the administration of township
assistance in the county:
(1) A suit or proceeding in favor of or against the board of
county commissioners concerning township assistance shall be
conducted in favor of or against the county in the county's
corporate name.
(2) The board of county commissioners is subject to the same
privileges and immunities as are accorded to a township
trustee under IC 12-20-3.
(3) The board of county commissioners shall propose uniform
standards for the issuance of township assistance throughout
the county and the processing of applications for township
assistance that meet the requirements of IC 12-20-5.5. The
standards shall be adopted and filed with the county fiscal
body.
(4) The board of county commissioners has the same powers
in the administration of township assistance for the county as
a township trustee has in the administration of township
assistance for a township under IC 12-20-4, IC 12-20-5,
IC 12-20-15, IC 12-20-16, IC 12-20-17, IC 12-20-18, and
IC 12-20-19.
(5) The same standards and requirements that:
(A) apply to; or
(B) may be imposed upon;
recipients of and applicants for township assistance under
IC 12-20-6, IC 12-20-7, IC 12-20-8, IC 12-20-9, IC 12-20-10,
IC 12-20-11, IC 12-20-12, and IC 12-20-13 apply to or may be
imposed upon recipients of and applicants for township
assistance administered by the board of county
commissioners.
(6) The county trustee may assert a claim against the estate of
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


an individual who received township assistance from the
county to the same extent as a township trustee may assert a
claim under IC 12-20-27 against the estate of an individual
who received township assistance from a township.
(7) The board of county commissioners is subject to the same
reporting requirements with respect to township assistance
administered on a countywide basis as a township trustee is
subject to under IC 12-20-28 with respect to township
assistance administered on a township basis.
(8) State and local agencies shall provide the board of county
commissioners with the information provided to a township
trustee under IC 12-20-7. A member of the board of county
commissioners or an employee of the county is subject to the
criminal penalty set forth in IC 12-20-7-6 for disclosure of
information.
(9) An applicant for township assistance and the board of
county commissioners may appeal a decision regarding
township assistance in the same manner that an appeal is
taken under IC 12-20-15.
(10) The department of workforce development, the county
office of the division of family resources, and any other state
or local government agency shall cooperate with and assist the
board of county commissioners in carrying out the county
commissioner's duties under this section and other statutes.
(d) Any application for township assistance for which the
township has not entered a final decision regarding the granting or
denial of township assistance by the close of business December 31,
2026, shall be treated as a new application filed with the county as
of that date. The board of county commissioners shall make a
decision on the application in accordance with the uniform
standards adopted under subsection (c)(3).
(e) Any application for township assistance that has been
granted before January 1, 2027, but for which assistance has not
been disbursed by the township, shall be disbursed and
administered by the board of county commissioners in accordance
with the township's grant of township assistance.
(f) The board of county commissioners shall prepare the
county's township assistance budget and submit it to the county
fiscal body for approval.
SECTION 28. IC 12-20-1.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


Chapter 1.5. Township Assistance Plan
Sec. 1. This chapter applies in each county.
Sec. 2. The county executive shall prepare a plan for the delivery
of township assistance throughout the county. The plan shall take
effect January 1, 2027.
Sec. 3. (a) In preparing a plan, the county executive shall:
(1) consider whether areas are overserved or underserved in
the delivery of township assistance;
(2) determine whether the county may contract with a service
provider to provide some or all township assistance services
to the county; and
(3) recognize and coordinate with other providers of relief for
indigent persons.
(b) The plan must meet the requirements of this chapter.
Sec. 4. After preparing a plan, the county executive shall review
the plan during at least two (2) public meetings at which the public
and any interested parties are entitled to the opportunity to
comment on the plan.
Sec. 5. A plan adopted under this chapter must include the
following:
(1) A plan specifying any necessary requirements in the
transition to the delivery of township assistance throughout
the county.
(2) The county's procedures for application and review of
township assistance requests.
(3) The forms of township assistance.
(4) A description of the supervisors, investigators, assistants,
or other necessary employees that will be employed in
discharging the coordinator's duties concerning the provision
of township assistance, and a recommendation concerning the
compensation of these employees.
(5) A description of the offices that must be maintained in the
county to carry out the coordinator's duties concerning the
provision of township assistance.
(6) A description of the proposed standards for township
assistance.
(7) In the case of any service, program, limitation, power, or
duty that may under this article or IC 12-30-4 be included in
the plan, a description of whether or not that service,
program, limitation, power, or duty is included in the plan.
(8) Any other provisions necessary to address the provision of
township assistance under this article.
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


Sec. 6. (a) The definitions in IC 5-11-1-16 apply to this section.
(b) A service provider that contracts with a county to provide
some or all township assistance services to the county is an entity
that is subject to examination by the state board of accounts to the
extent required under IC 5-11-1-9. A service provider shall be
responsible for the costs of an examination.
Sec. 7. After a plan is approved by the county executive, the plan
and the transfer of township assistance responsibilities to the
county as provided in the plan take effect January 1, 2027.
Sec. 8. After January 1, 2027, the board of county
commissioners may adopt amendments to the plan.
SECTION 29. IC 12-20-20-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.134-2016,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) If a township trustee before January 1,
2027, and the board of county commissioners after December 31,
2026, as administrator of township assistance, grants township
assistance to an indigent individual or to any other person or agency on
a township assistance order as provided by law or obligates the
township for an item properly payable from township assistance
money, the claim against the township must be:
(1) itemized and sworn to as provided by law;
(2) accompanied by the original township assistance order, which
must be itemized and signed; and
(3) checked with the records of the township trustee, as
administrator of township assistance, and audited and certified by
the township trustee.
(b) The township trustee before January 1, 2027, and the board
of county commissioners after December 31, 2026, shall pay claims
against the township for township assistance in the same manner that
other claims against the township are paid. The township trustee, when
authorized to pay claims directly to vendors, shall pay a claim within
forty-five (45) days. The township trustee shall pay the claim from:
(1) any balance standing to the credit of the township against
which the claim is filed; or
(2) from any other available fund from which advancements can
be made to the township for that purpose.
(c) A township assistance claim for prepaid electric service shall be
paid in accordance with IC 12-20-16-3.5.
(d) This subsection applies after December 31, 2026. A county
shall pay claims against the county for township assistance in the
same manner that other claims against the county are paid.
Notwithstanding IC 5-11-10, the county auditor may make
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


payments for claims payable from the county township assistance
fund established by IC 12-20-21-6 in advance of an allowance by
the county executive. Each payment of expenses under this section
must be supported by a fully itemized invoice or bill and
certification by the county auditor. The county executive shall
review and allow the claim at its next regular or special meeting
following the preapproved payment of the expense. The board of
county commissioners when authorized to pay claims directly to
vendors, shall pay a claim within forty-five (45) days.
SECTION 30. IC 12-20-21-6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) On January 1, 2027, a
township assistance fund is established in each county.
(b) The fund shall be raised by a tax levy that:
(1) is in addition to all other tax levies authorized; and
(2) subject to IC 6-1.1-18.5-22, shall be levied annually for
property taxes first due and payable in 2027 and thereafter by
the county fiscal body on all taxable property in the county in
the amount necessary to pay the items, awards, claims,
allowances, assistance, and other expenses set forth in the
annual county township assistance budget.
(c) The tax imposed under this section shall be collected as other
state and county ad valorem taxes are collected.
(d) The following shall be paid into the fund:
(1) All receipts from the tax imposed under this section.
(2) Any other money required by law to be placed in the fund.
(e) The fund is available to pay township assistance expenses
and obligations set forth in the annual budget.
(f) Money in the fund at the end of a budget year does not revert
to the county general fund.
(g) The department of local government finance shall, for
property taxes first due and payable after December 31, 2026,
adjust the maximum permissible ad valorem property tax levy of
the county as necessary and proper to account for the transfer of
township assistance budgeting and property tax levies from
townships to counties after December 31, 2026.
SECTION 31. IC 12-20-24-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.5. This chapter does not apply
after December 31, 2026.
SECTION 32. IC 12-20-24.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 24.5. Township Assistance Borrowing
Sec. 1. This chapter applies after December 31, 2026.
Sec. 2. (a) In addition to the other methods of township
assistance financing provided by this article, if the board of county
commissioners determines that the county's township assistance
fund will be exhausted before the end of a fiscal year, the board of
county commissioners shall notify the county fiscal body of that
determination.
(b) After receiving notice under subsection (a) that the county's
township assistance fund will be exhausted before the end of a
fiscal year, the county fiscal body may appeal to the department of
local government finance for the right to borrow money on a short
term basis to fund township assistance services in the county. In
the appeal, the county fiscal body must do the following:
(1) Show that the amount of money contained in the township
assistance fund will not be sufficient to fund services required
to be provided within the county by this article.
(2) Show the amount of money that the county fiscal body
estimates will be needed to fund the deficit.
(3) Indicate a period, not to exceed five (5) years, during
which the county would repay the loan.
Sec. 3. (a) If upon appeal under section 2 of this chapter the
department of local government finance determines that a county
fiscal body should be allowed to borrow money under this chapter,
the department shall order the board of county commissioners to
borrow the money from a financial institution on behalf of the
county fiscal body and to deposit the money borrowed in the
county's township assistance fund.
(b) If upon appeal under section 2 of this chapter, the
department of local government finance determines that a county
fiscal body should not be allowed to borrow money, the county
fiscal body may not borrow money under this chapter for that
year.
Sec. 4. If a loan is approved under this chapter, the department
of local government finance shall determine the period during
which the county shall repay the loan. However, the period may
not exceed five (5) years.
Sec. 5. The department of local government finance may not do
any of the following:
(1) Approve a request to borrow money made under this
chapter unless the county fiscal body determines that the
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


county's township assistance fund will be exhausted before the
fund can fund all county obligations incurred under this
article.
(2) Recommend or approve a loan that will exceed the
estimated amount of the deficit.
Sec. 6. (a) If a county fiscal body:
(1) appeals before August 1 for permission to borrow money;
(2) receives permission from the department to borrow money
before November 1 of that year; and
(3) borrows money under this chapter;
the county fiscal body shall levy a property tax beginning in the
next succeeding year and continuing for the term of the loan in an
amount each year that will be sufficient to pay the principal and
interest due on the loan for the year.
(b) If the county fiscal body:
(1) appeals after August 1 for permission to borrow money;
(2) receives permission from the department of local
government finance to borrow money; and
(3) borrows money in the year of the appeal under this
chapter;
the county fiscal body shall levy a property tax beginning in the
second succeeding year and continuing for the term of the loan in
an amount each year that will be sufficient to pay the principal and
interest due on the loan for the year.
(c) The property taxes levied under this section shall be retained
by the county executive and applied by the county executive to
retire the debt.
Sec. 7. A county fiscal body must make an additional
appropriation before money borrowed under this chapter may be
spent.
SECTION 33. IC 12-20-26-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.5. This chapter does not apply
after December 31, 2026.
SECTION 34. IC 15-16-7-4, AS ADDED BY P.L.2-2008,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The weed control board consists of the
following members to be appointed by the authorizing body:
(1) One (1) member who is:
(A) a township trustee of a township in the county; or
(B) after December 31, 2026, the board of county
commissioners, who is responsible for the destruction of
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


detrimental plants described in this chapter.
(2) One (1) soil and water conservation district supervisor.
(3) One (1) representative from the agricultural community of the
county.
(4) One (1) representative from the county highway department
or an appointee of the county commissioners.
(5) One (1) cooperative extension service agent from the county
to serve in a nonvoting advisory capacity.
(b) Each board member shall be appointed for a term of four (4)
years. All vacancies in the membership of the board shall be filled for
the unexpired term in the same manner as initial appointments.
(c) The board shall elect a chairperson and a secretary. The
members of the board are not entitled to receive any compensation, but
are entitled to any traveling and other expenses that are necessary in the
discharge of the members' duties.
SECTION 35. IC 36-1-2-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.278-2019,
SECTION 178, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. "Executive" means the following:
(1) The board of commissioners, for a county that does not have
a consolidated city.
(2) The mayor of the consolidated city, for a county having a
consolidated city.
(3) The mayor, for a city.
(4) The president of the town council, for a town.
(5) The trustee, for a township before January 1, 2027, and the
board of county commissioners upon assuming the duties of
the trustee after December 31, 2026.
(6) The superintendent, for a school corporation.
(7) The chief executive officer, for any other political subdivision.
SECTION 36. IC 36-1-2-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.227-2005,
SECTION 12, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. "Fiscal officer" means:
(1) auditor, for a county not having a consolidated city;
(2) controller, for a:
(A) consolidated city;
(B) county having a consolidated city, except as otherwise
provided; or
(C) second class city;
(3) clerk-treasurer, for a third class city;
(4) clerk-treasurer, for a town; or
(5) trustee, for a township, before January 1, 2027, and the
board of county commissioners upon assuming the duties of
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


the trustee after December 31, 2026.
SECTION 37. IC 36-2-6-4.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 4.6. Notwithstanding IC 5-11-10, after December 31,
2026, the county auditor may make payments for claims payable
from the county township assistance fund under IC 12-20-21-6 in
advance of allowance by the county executive. Each payment of
expenses under this section must be supported by a fully itemized
invoice or bill and certification by the county auditor. The county
executive shall review and allow the claim at its next regular or
special meeting following the preapproved payment of the expense.
SECTION 38. IC 36-2-15-0.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 0.1. (a) This section applies to
the office of a county assessor in existence on May 10, 2026.
(b) On July 1, 2026, the office of county assessor is abolished.
(c) On July 1, 2026, all the powers and duties of the county
assessor are transferred to the county auditor.
(d) On July 1, 2026, all of the following are transferred to the
county auditor:
(1) All employment positions as of June 30, 2026, of all
employees of the county assessor.
(2) The real and personal property of the county assessor.
(3) The obligations outstanding on June 30, 2026, of the
county assessor.
(4) The funds of the county assessor.
(e) Before July 1, 2026, the county auditor shall interview, or
give the opportunity to interview to, each individual who:
(1) is, as of May 15, 2026, an employee of the county assessor;
and
(2) applies before June 1, 2026, for an employment position
referred to in subsection (d)(1).
SECTION 39. IC 36-2-15-0.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 0.2. (a) Each county assessor
whose duties will be transferred under section 0.1 of this chapter
shall:
(1) organize the records of the assessor's office relating to the
assessment of tangible property in a manner prescribed by the
department of local government finance; and
(2) transfer the records before July 1, 2026, as directed by the
department of local government finance.
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


(b) The department of local government finance shall determine
a procedure and schedule for the transfer of the records and
operations from the county assessor to the county auditor. The
assessors shall assist each other and coordinate their efforts to:
(1) ensure an orderly transfer of all records; and
(2) provide for an uninterrupted and professional transition
of any functions of assessors that are consistent with this
chapter, IC 6-1.1, and the directions of the department of
local government finance.
SECTION 40. IC 36-2-15-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.167-2015,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JUNE 30, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) A county assessor shall be elected under
IC 3-10-2-13 by the voters of the county.
(b) To be eligible to serve as an assessor, an individual must meet
the following qualifications before taking office:
(1) If the individual has never held the office of county assessor,
the individual must have attained a level two assessor-appraiser
certification under IC 6-1.1-35.5.
(2) If the individual has held the office of county assessor, the
individual must have attained a level three assessor-appraiser
certification under IC 6-1.1-35.5.
(c) A county assessor must reside within the county as provided in
Article 6, Section 6 of the Constitution of the State of Indiana. The
assessor forfeits office if the assessor ceases to be a resident of the
county.
(d) The term of office of a county assessor is four (4) years,
beginning January 1 after election and continuing until a successor is
elected and qualified.
(e) This section expires July 1, 2026.
SECTION 41. IC 36-2-15-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.146-2008,
SECTION 692, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JUNE 30, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) Subject to subsection (b),
the assessor shall keep the assessor's office in a building provided at
the county seat by the county executive. The assessor shall keep the
office open for business during regular business hours on every day of
the year except Sundays and legal holidays. However, the assessor may
close the office on days specified by the county executive according to
custom and practice of the county.
(b) After June 30, 2008, the county assessor may establish one (1)
or more satellite offices in the county.
(c) This section expires July 1, 2026.
SECTION 42. IC 36-2-15-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.167-2015,
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) Subject to section 0.1 of this chapter, the
county assessor shall perform the functions assigned by statute to the
county assessor, including the following:
(1) Countywide equalization.
(2) Selection and maintenance of a countywide computer system.
(3) Certification of gross assessments to the county auditor.
(4) Discovery of omitted property.
(5) In:
(A) a township in which the transfer of duties of the elected
township assessor is required by subsection (c); or
(B) a township in which the duties relating to the assessment
of tangible property are not required to be performed by a
township assessor elected under IC 36-6-5;
Performance of the assessment duties prescribed by IC 6-1.1.
(b) A transfer of duties between assessors does not affect:
(1) any assessment, assessment appeal, or other official action
made by an assessor before the transfer; or
(2) any pending action against, or the rights of any party that may
possess a legal claim against, an assessor that is not described in
subdivision (1).
Any assessment, assessment appeal, or other official action of an
assessor made by the assessor within the scope of the assessor's official
duties before the transfer is considered as having been made by the
assessor to whom the duties are transferred.
(c) If the individual elected to the office of township assessor has
not attained the assessor-appraiser certification level required by
IC 36-6-5-1 before the date the term of office begins, the assessment
duties prescribed by IC 6-1.1 that would otherwise be performed in the
township by the township assessor are transferred to the county
assessor on that date. If assessment duties in a township are transferred
to the county assessor under this subsection, those assessment duties
are transferred back to the township assessor if at a later election an
individual who has attained the assessor-appraiser certification level
required by IC 36-6-5-1 is elected to the office of township assessor.
SECTION 43. IC 36-2-15-7, AS ADDED BY P.L.219-2007,
SECTION 109, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JUNE 30, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) Each county assessor,
elected township assessor, or township trustee-assessor whose
assessment duties prescribed by IC 6-1.1 will be transferred under
section 5 of this chapter shall:
(1) organize the records of the assessor's office relating to the
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


assessment of tangible property in a manner prescribed by the
department of local government finance; and
(2) transfer the records as directed by the department of local
government finance.
(b) The department of local government finance shall determine a
procedure and schedule for the transfer of the records and operations.
The assessors shall assist each other and coordinate their efforts to:
(1) ensure an orderly transfer of all records; and
(2) provide for an uninterrupted and professional transition of the
property assessment functions consistent with this chapter and the
directions of the department of local government finance.
(c) This section expires July 1, 2026.
SECTION 44. IC 36-6-4-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 0.5. (a) The term of each township trustee shall expire
December 31, 2026.
(b) Beginning after December 31, 2026, the board of county
commissioners of the county in which a township is located shall
assume the duties of the township trustee for the township and all
the powers and duties of the township trustee are transferred to the
county commissioners.
(c) The board of county commissioners shall do the following:
(1) Administer township assistance countywide under
IC 12-20 and IC 12-30-4.
(2) Perform all other duties prescribed for the township
trustee by statute before January 1, 2027.
SECTION 45. IC 36-6-5-0.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 0.3. (a) This section applies to the office of
a township assessor in existence on May 10, 2026.
(b) On July 1, 2026, the office of township assessor is abolished.
(c) On July 1, 2026, all the powers and duties of the township
assessor are transferred to the county auditor of the county in
which the township is located.
(d) On July 1, 2026, all of the following are transferred to the
county auditor:
(1) All employment positions as of June 30, 2026, of all
employees of each township assessor in the county.
(2) The real and personal property of each township assessor
in the county.
(3) The obligations outstanding on June 30, 2026, of each
township assessor in the county.
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


(4) The funds of each township assessor in the county.
(e) Before July 1, 2026, the county auditor shall interview, or
give the opportunity to interview to, each individual who:
(1) is, as of May 15, 2026, an employee of a township assessor
in the county; and
(2) applies before June 1, 2026, for an employment position
referred to in subsection (d)(1).
SECTION 46. IC 36-6-5-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 0.5. (a) Each township assessor whose
duties will be transferred under section 0.3 of this chapter shall:
(1) organize the records of the assessor's office relating to the
assessment of tangible property in a manner prescribed by the
department of local government finance; and
(2) transfer the records before July 1, 2026, as directed by the
department of local government finance.
(b) The department of local government finance shall determine
a procedure and schedule for the transfer of the records and
operations from the township assessor to the county auditor. The
assessors shall assist each other and coordinate their efforts to:
(1) ensure an orderly transfer of all records; and
(2) provide for an uninterrupted and professional transition
of any functions of assessors that are consistent with this
chapter, IC 6-1.1, and the directions of the department of
local government finance.
SECTION 47. IC 36-6-5-1 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 1. (a) Subject to subsection (g), before 2009, a township
assessor shall be elected under IC 3-10-2-13 by the voters of each
township:
(1) having:
(A) a population of more than eight thousand (8,000); or
(B) an elected township assessor or the authority to elect a
township assessor before January 1, 1979; and
(2) in which the number of parcels of real property on January 1,
2008, is at least fifteen thousand (15,000).
(b) Subject to subsection (g), before 2009, a township assessor shall
be elected under IC 3-10-2-14 (repealed effective July 1, 2008) in each
township:
(1) having a population of more than five thousand (5,000) but
not more than eight thousand (8,000), if:
(A) the legislative body of the township, by resolution,
declares that the office of township assessor is necessary; and
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


(B) the resolution is filed with the county election board not
later than the first date that a declaration of candidacy may be
filed under IC 3-8-2; and
(2) in which the number of parcels of real property on January 1,
2008, is at least fifteen thousand (15,000).
(c) Subject to subsection (g), a township government that is created
by merger under IC 36-6-1.5 shall elect only one (1) township assessor
under this section.
(d) Subject to subsection (g), after 2008 a township assessor shall
be elected under IC 3-10-2-13 only by the voters of each township in
which:
(1) the number of parcels of real property on January 1, 2008, is
at least fifteen thousand (15,000); and
(2) the transfer to the county assessor of the assessment duties
prescribed by IC 6-1.1 is disapproved in the referendum under
IC 36-2-15.
(e) The township assessor must reside within the township as
provided in Article 6, Section 6 of the Constitution of the State of
Indiana. The assessor forfeits office if the assessor ceases to be a
resident of the township.
(f) The term of office of a township assessor is four (4) years,
beginning January 1 after election and continuing until a successor is
elected and qualified. However, the term of office of a township
assessor elected at a general election in which no other township
officer is elected ends on December 31 after the next election in which
any other township officer is elected.
(g) To be eligible to serve as a township assessor, an individual
must meet the following qualifications before taking office:
(1) If the individual has never held the office of township
assessor, the individual must have attained a level two
assessor-appraiser certification under IC 6-1.1-35.5.
(2) If the individual has held the office of township assessor, the
individual must have attained a level three assessor-appraiser
certification under IC 6-1.1-35.5.
(h) After June 30, 2008, the county assessor shall perform the
assessment duties prescribed by IC 6-1.1 in a township in which the
number of parcels of real property on January 1, 2008, is less than
fifteen thousand (15,000).
SECTION 48. IC 36-6-5-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.146-2008,
SECTION 711, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) Except as provided in
subsection (b) and section 0.3 of this chapter, the assessor shall
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


perform the duties prescribed by statute, including assessment duties
prescribed by IC 6-1.1.
(b) Subsection (a) does not apply if the duties of the township
assessor have been transferred to the county assessor as described in
IC 6-1.1-1-24 or IC 36-2-15.
SECTION 49. IC 36-6-5-4 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 4. (a) Before July 1, 2017, an employee of a township
assessor who performs real property assessing duties must have
attained the level of certification under IC 6-1.1-35.5 that the township
assessor is required to attain under section 1(g) of this chapter.
(b) After June 30, 2017, an employee of a township assessor who is
responsible for placing an assessed valuation on real property must
have attained the certification of a level three assessor-appraiser under
IC 6-1.1-35.5.
(c) This subsection applies after June 30, 2017. If the township
assessor has not attained the certification of a level three
assessor-appraiser under IC 6-1.1-35.5, the township fiscal body shall
authorize either of the following:
(1) The appointment of at least one (1) deputy or employee who
has attained the certification of a level three assessor-appraiser
under IC 6-1.1-35.5.
(2) Contracting with a person who has attained, or who employs
for purposes of the contract an individual who has attained, the
certification of a level three assessor-appraiser under
IC 6-1.1-35.5. The individual under contract with the township
assessor under this subdivision shall assist the township assessor
with assessment duties as determined by the township assessor.
Payment for the deputy, employee, or contractor shall be made from the
budget for the township assessor.
SECTION 50. IC 36-12-1-15 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15. After December 31, 2026, the
powers and duties of a township trustee concerning public
libraries, library districts, or provision or receipt of library
services by contract under this article are transferred to the board
of county commissioners.
SECTION 51. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) The legislative
services agency shall prepare, as directed by the legislative council,
legislation for introduction in the 2027 regular session of the
general assembly to organize and correct statutes affected by this
act, if necessary.
(b) This SECTION expires July 1, 2028.
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120


SECTION 52. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 255—LS 6935/DI 120